Washington statutes.
RCW 7.06.080

Application date for request under RCW 7.06.050 and 7.06.060.

RCW 7.06.050 and 7.06.060 apply to all requests for a trial de novo filed pursuant to and in appeal of an arbitrator's decision and filed on or after June 13, 2002.

[ 2002 c 339 s 3.]